Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.68.010

Acquisition—Care and investment of funds.

A code city may exercise the powers to acquire, own, improve, manage, operate and regulate real and personal property for the operation of the city morgue, cemetery or other place for the burial of the dead, to create cemetery boards or commissions, to establish and manage funds for cemetery improvement and care and to make all necessary or desirable rules and regulations concerning the control and management of burial places and the investment of funds relating thereto and accounting therefor as is authorized by chapter 68.52 RCW, RCW 35.22.280, 35.23.440, * 35.24.300 and 35.27.370(2) in accordance with the procedures and requirements prescribed by said laws and authority to be included within a cemetery district as authorized and conformed to the requirements of Title 68 RCW.

[ 1987 c 331 s 80; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.68.010.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 35.24.300 was recodified as RCW 35.23.452 pursuant to 1994 c 81 s 90.

Effective date—1987 c 331: See RCW 68.05.900.